Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-303
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 9-304 to 9-321.03 shall be used.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 69;

Laws 1988, LB 1232, § 6;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 63;

Laws 2003, LB 3, § 2.